test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_veerdi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - veerdi: # ok VEERDI 
    veerdi+N+Sg+Nom:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Gen:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Acc:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Ill:   viärdán
    veerdi+N+Sg+Loc:   veerdist
    veerdi+N+Sg+Com:   verdijn
    veerdi+N+Sg+Abe:   veˊrdittáá
    veerdi+N+Ess:      veerdin
    veerdi+N+Par:      veerdid
    veerdi+N+Pl+Nom:   veerdih
    veerdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [veerdij, veˊrdij]
    veerdi+N+Pl+Acc:   veerdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Ill:   verdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Loc:   veerdijn
    veerdi+N+Pl+Com:   veˊrdijguin
    veerdi+N+Pl+Abe:   veˊrdijttáá
